Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB260.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 198A IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) (a) There is hereby established in the State Treasury a revolving account to be
known as the abandoned home pool fund. The fund shall consist of moneys
received from state appropriations, gifts, grants, federal funds, and all
repayment, interest, or other return on the investment of fund dollars as
required by this section.
(b) The fund shall be administered by the corporation.
(c) All repayment, interest, or other return on the investment of fund moneys
are required to be returned to the fund and used for eligible activities in
accordance with this section.
(d) Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, any moneys remaining in the fund at the
close of the fiscal year shall not lapse but shall be carried forward into the
succeeding fiscal year to be used for the purposes set forth in this section.
(2) Eligible activities that may receive funding under this section shall include the
purchase and improvement of vacant and abandoned homes in the
Commonwealth.
(3) Entities eligible to receive funding include:
(a) A unit of local government; and
(b) A local government housing authority.
(4) Residential housing units purchased, improved, or provided under this section
shall be deed-restricted for a minimum of twenty (20) years as follows:
(a) The corporation shall have right of first refusal to purchase any property
provided under this section;
(b) All units shall maintain the same demographic restrictions on residents as
Page 1 of 4
XXXX 1/3/2025 12:44 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1052
may be required under this section for initial selection; and
(c) Amendments to deed-restrictions may be granted by the corporation on a
case-by-case basis.
(5) No more than seventy-five percent (75%) of a particular eligible activity shall be
funded under this section. The remaining twenty-five percent (25%) shall be
financed by the eligible entity.
(6) The purchase or improvement of vacant and abandoned homes shall be
prioritized in areas where fewer than twenty-five percent (25%) of existing homes
are currently vacant and abandoned.
(7) Once a vacant and abandoned home has been purchased and improved by an
eligible entity under this section, the entity shall:
(a) Calculate the entire cost of the purchase and improvement of the home; and
(b) Rent the location to an individual or family with an income equal to or less
than eighty percent (80%) of the area median income. Rent shall be due
monthly and the rent amount shall be the lesser of:
1. The entire cost of the purchase and improvement of the home divided
into one hundred eighty (180) equal payments that include an interest
rate no higher than three percent (3%); or
2. Thirty percent (30%) of the individual's or family's income.
(8) Once the individual or family has made one hundred eighty (180) monthly
payments, the entity shall transfer title to the property to the individual or family.
(9) Rent payments made to an eligible entity under this section shall be distributed
pro rata between the eligible entity and the fund, based upon the portion of the
activity cost initially financed by the eligible entity and the funded amount in
accordance with subsection (5) of this section.
(10) If an individual or family chooses to leave or is evicted from a home rental under
this section, they shall receive:
Page 2 of 4
XXXX 1/3/2025 12:44 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1052
(a) Twenty percent (20%) of the money paid by the individual or family in rent
if they have made more than twelve (12) monthly payments;
(b) Thirty percent (30%) of the money paid by the individual or family in rent if
they have made more than thirty-six (36) monthly payments;
(c) Forty percent (40%) of the money paid by the individual or family in rent if
they have made more than sixty (60) monthly payments;
(d) Fifty percent (50%) of the money paid by the individual or family in rent if
they have made more than eighty-four (84) monthly payments;
(e) Sixty percent (60%) of the money paid by the individual or family in rent if
they have made more than one hundred eight (108) monthly payments;
(f) Seventy percent (70%) of the money paid by the individual or family in rent
if they have made more than one hundred thirty-two (132) monthly
payments; or
(g) Eighty percent (80%) of the money paid by the individual or family in rent if
they have made more than one hundred fifty-six (156) monthly payments.
(11) Payments made under subsection (10) of this section shall be based upon the
portion of the activity cost initially financed by the eligible entity and the funded
amount in accordance with subsection (5) of this section.
(12) In the event an individual or family who is renting a home under to this section is
unable to make a monthly payment for more than ninety (90) days, the eligible
entity shall institute an eviction action in compliance with applicable state and
local laws and ordinances.
(13) The corporation shall:
(a) Issue a public notice to eligible entities of the availability of moneys from
the fund at least twice each calendar year and provide a reasonable
opportunity for the filing of applications;
(b) Approve or deny properly submitted and completed applications within
Page 3 of 4
XXXX 1/3/2025 12:44 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1052
ninety (90) days of their receipt;
(c) Approve as many applications as will effectively use available moneys in the
fund; and
(d) Approve or deny applications by ranking the applications competitively
using criteria established by the corporation through promulgation of an
administrative regulation in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A.
(14) A person or entity shall not discriminate in the sale or rental, or otherwise
making available or denying, a housing unit funded under this section to any
buyer or renter because of race, religion, sex, familial status, disability, or
national origin.
Page 4 of 4
XXXX 1/3/2025 12:44 PM Jacketed